scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     anokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anokii 
     anokii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anokiid
     anokii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enokiid
     anookii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanookii
     anookii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanookii
     anookii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanookii
     anookii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anookii
     anookii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anookiid
     anookii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enookiid
     anwaataa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanwaataa
     anwaataa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anwaataa
     anwaataa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anwaataad
     anwaataa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enwaataad
     anwaataa+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: gego anwaataaken
     anwaataa+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl: gego anwaataakegon
     apatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapatoo
     apatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapatoo
     apatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapatoo
     apatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apatoo
     apatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apatood
     apatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epatood
     apatoo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: apatoon
     apiichibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapiichibatoo
     apiichibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapiichibatoo
     apiichibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapiichibatoo
     apiichibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichibatoo 
     apiichibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichibatood
     apiichibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiichibatood
     apiichibii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapiichibii
     apiichibii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichibii
     apiichibii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichibiid
     apiichibii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiichibiid
     apiichitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapiichitaa
     apiichitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapiichitaa
     apiichitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapiichitaa
     apiichitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichitaa
     apiichitaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichitaad
     apiichitaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiichitaad
     apiichii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapiichii
     apiichii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapiichii
     apiichii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichii
     apiichii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichiid
     apiichii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiichiid
     apiichiiwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapiichiiwii
     apiichiiwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapiichiiwii
     apiichiiwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapiichiiwii
     apiichiiwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichiiwii
     apiichiiwii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichiiwiid
     apiichiiwii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiichiiwiid
     apiizikaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapiizikaa
     apiizikaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapiizikaa
     apiizikaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapiizikaa
     apiizikaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiizikaa
     apiizikaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiizikaad
     apiizikaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epiizikaad
     asanii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: asanii
     asanii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: asaniid
     asanii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: esaniid
     ashwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indashwii
     ashwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashwii
     ashwii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ashwiid
     ashwii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eshwiid
     ashwii+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: ashwiin
     atoobii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indatoobii
     atoobii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atoobii
     atoobii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atoobiid
     atoobii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etoobiid
     awasewebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indawasewebatoo
     awasewebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewebatoo
     awasewebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewebatood
     awasewebatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewasewebatood
     awaseweyaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaadagaa
     awaseweyaadagaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaadagaad
     awaseweyaadagaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewaseweyaadagaad
     ayagaasininjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayagaasininjii
     ayagaasininjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayagaasininjii
     ayagaasininjii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayagaasininjiid
     ayagaasininjii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyagaasininjiid
     ayapatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayapatoo
     ayapatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayapatoo
     ayapatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayapatood
     ayapatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyapatood
     ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayaa
     ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayaa
     ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayaa
     ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaa 
     ayaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaad
     ayaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyaad
     ayekoninjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekoninjii
     ayekoninjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekoninjii
     ayekoninjii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekoninjiid
     ayekoninjii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekoninjiid
     ayinanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayinanokii
     ayinanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayinanokii
     ayinanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayinanokii
     ayinanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinanokii
     ayinanokii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinanokiid
     ayinanokii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyinanokiid
     ayindaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nindayindaamin
     ayindaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayindaa
     ayindaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayindaawag
     ayindaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayindaad
     ayindaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayindaawaad
     ayindaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: eyindaawaad
     azhashkiiwininjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhashkiiwininjii
     azhashkiiwininjii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwininjii
     azhashkiiwininjii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwininjiid
     azhashkiiwininjii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhashkiiwininjiid
     azhebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhebatoo
     azhebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhebatoo
     azhebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhebatoo
     azhebatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebatoo
     azhebatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebatood
     azhebatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhebatood
     azhedakokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhedakokii
     azhedakokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhedakokii
     azhedakokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhedakokii
     azhedakokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhedakokii
     azhedakokii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhedakokiid
     azhedakokii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhedakokiid
     azhedaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhedaabii
     azhedaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhedaabii
     azhedaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhedaabiid
     azhedaabii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhedaabiid
     azhe'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhe'adoo
     azhe'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhe'adoo
     azhe'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhe'adoo
     azhe'adoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhe'adoo
     azhe'adoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhe'adood
     azhe'adoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhe'adood
     azheshkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazheshkaa
     azheshkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazheshkaa
     azheshkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazheshkaa
     azheshkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azheshkaa
     azheshkaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azheshkaad
     azheshkaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezheshkaad
     azhetaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhetaa
     azhetaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhetaa
     azhetaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhetaa
     azhetaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhetaa
     azhetaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhetaad
     azhetaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhetaad
     azheyaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazheyaadagaa
     azheyaadagaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azheyaadagaa
     azheyaadagaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azheyaadagaad
     azheyaadagaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezheyaadagaad
     aaba'oodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaaba'oodoo
     aaba'oodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaaba'oodoo
     aaba'oodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaaba'oodoo
     aaba'oodoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaba'oodood
     aaba'oodoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaaba'oodood
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabaakawi-ayaa
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaabaakawi-ayaa
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaabaakawi-ayaa
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaabaakawi-ayaa
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabaakawi-ayaa
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabaakawi-ayaad
     aabaakawi-ayaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaabaakawi-ayaad
     aabidanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabidanokii
     aabidanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaabidanokii
     aabidanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaabidanokii
     aabidanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabidanokii
     aabidanokii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabidanokiid
     aabidanokii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaabidanokiid
     aabijibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaabijibatoo
     aabijibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabijibatoo
     aabijibatoo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabijibatoo
     aabijibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabijibatood
     aabijitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabijitaa
     aabijitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaabijitaa
     aabijitaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabijitaa
     aabijitaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabijitaad
     aabijitaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaabijitaad
     aabijiibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaabijiibaa
     aabijiibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaabijiibaa
     aabijiibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaabijiibaa
     aabijiibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabijiibaa
     aabijiibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabijiibaad
     aabijiibaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaabijiibaad
     aabishkaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabishkaa
     aabishkaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabishkaad
     aabitoobii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabitoobii
     aabitoobii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabitoobiid
     aabitoobii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaabitoobiid
     aabooda'inagizhii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaabooda'inagizhii
     aabooda'inagizhii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabooda'inagizhii
     aabooda'inagizhii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aabooda'inagizhiid
     aaboozikaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaboozikaa 
     aaboozikaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaboozikaad
     aaboozikaa+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaaboozikaad
     aandakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaandakii
     aandakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaandakii
     aandakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ndaandakii
     aandakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaandakii
     aandakii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aandakii 
     aandakii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aandakiid
     aandakii+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaandakiid
     aandanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaandanokii
     aandanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaandanokii
     aandanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaandanokii
     aandanokii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aandanokii
     aandanokii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aandanokiid
     aanjitwaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaanjitwaa
     aanjitwaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanjitwaa
     aanjitwaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aanjitwaad
     aapijibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaapijibatoo
     aapijibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaapijibatoo
     aapijibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaapijibatoo
     aapijibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijibatoo
     aapijibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijibatood
     aapijibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaapijibatood
     aatebii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaatebii
     aatebii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaatebii
     aatebii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaatebii
     aatebii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatebiid
     aatebii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaatebiid
     aatebii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatebii 
     aawada'oodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawada'oodoo
     aawada'oodoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawada'oodoo
     aawada'oodoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawada'oodood
     aawada'oodoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawada'oodood
     aawadinisedaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawadinisedaabii
     aawadinisedaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadinisedaabii
     aawadinisedaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadinisedaabiid
     aawajidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawajidaabii
     aawajidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawajidaabii
     aawajidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaawajidaabii
     aawajidaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajidaabii
     aawajidaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajidaabiid
     aayaazhawaakwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaayaazhawaakwii
     aayaazhawaakwii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaazhawaakwii
     aayaazhawaakwii+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaazhawaakwiid
     aayaazhawibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaayaazhawibatoo
     aayaazhawibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaazhawibatoo
     aayaazhawibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaazhawibatood
     aayaazhawibatoo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaayaazhawibatood
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawagaakobatoo
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaakobatoo
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawagaakobatoo
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawagaakobatoo
     aazhawagaakobatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakobatoo
